Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB709.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 42.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [By January 1, 2012, ]The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide public
access to records relating to expenditures of the executive branch of state
government through display of the records on a website[Web site]. The
website[Web site] shall provide:
(a) Financial information of expenditures not exempt under the provisions of state
or federal law, including:
1. The payee name;
2. The category or type of the expenditure;
3. A description of the reason for the expenditure, if available;
4. The expenditure amount; and
5. A link to the financial document, if the document is electronically
available;
(b) A searchable format;
(c) Access to the current enacted Executive Branch Budget; and
(d) A link to the public access website[Web site] displays of the legislative and
judicial branches of state government, and of the public institutions of higher
education.
(2) Information on the website[Web site] shall be updated at least [on a ]monthly[
basis]. However, information on the website[Web site] which is part of, or
contained in, an electronic accounting system utilized by all branches of state
government, such as the Enhanced Management Administrative Reporting System
(EMARS), shall be updated [on a ]weekly[ basis].
(3) The cabinet shall maintain exclusive control and be considered the sole custodian of
all information and records generated by and through activity of the executive
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1643
branch of government, notwithstanding the situs of the information and the records
in another branch of government, and disclosure thereof shall only be by the cabinet
in accordance with applicable law.
(4) In order to reduce website[Web site] development costs and enhance public access
and use of records viewed through websites[Web sites] as provided by this section
and KRS 7.505 and 26A.260, each branch of state government shall freely share
with the other branches of state government the software, software developments,
and all applications, data, and information within its control used for website[Web
site] design, appearance, content, and operation in compliance with, or in
furtherance of, the purposes contemplated by this section and KRS 7.505 and
26A.260.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed